pl: Obecność pasa bezpieczeństwa: Pasy w zestawie; Zapięcia w zestawie (bez pasów); Tylko punkty mocowania (bez pasów i zapięć); Nie dotyczy; Wymaga przełożenia pasów i/lub zapięć z oryginalnego fotela; Inne
es: Disposición de cinturones de seguridad: Cinturones incluidos; Hebillas incluidas (sin cinturones); Solo puntos de montaje (sin cinturones ni hebillas); No aplica; Requiere la transferencia de cinturones y/o hebillas del asiento original; Otro
th: การคาดเข็มขัดนิรภัย: มีเข็มขัดมาให้; มีหัวเข็มขัดมาให้ (ไม่มีเข็มขัด); จุดยึดเท่านั้น (ไม่มีเข็มขัดหรือหัวเข็มขัด); ไม่สามารถใช้ได้; ต้องย้ายเข็มขัดและ/หรือหัวเข็มขัดจากเบาะเดิม; อื่นๆ
da: Medfølgende sikkerhedssele: Seler medfølger; Spænder medfølger (ingen seler); Kun monteringspunkter (ingen seler eller spænder); Ikke relevant; Kræver overflytning af seler og/eller spænder fra originalt sæde; Andet
tr: Emniyet kemeri dahil durumu: Kemerler dahildir; Tokalar dahildir (kemer yok); Yalnızca montaj noktaları (kemer veya toka yok); Geçerli değil; Kemerlerin ve/veya tokaların orijinal koltuktan aktarılması gerekir; Diğer
cs: Zajištění bezpečnostních pásů: Pásy jsou součástí balení; Zámky jsou součástí balení (bez pásů); Pouze upevňovací body (bez pásů a zámků); Nelze použít; Vyžaduje přenos pásů anebo zámků z původního sedadla; Jiné
ja: シートベルト装備: ベルト付き; バックル付き (ベルトなし); 取り付けポイントのみ (ベルトやバックルなし); 該当なし; 元のシートからベルトやバックルの移植が必要; その他
sl-SI: Prisotnost varnostnega pasu: Vključeni pasovi; Vključene zaponke (brez pasov); Samo pritrdilne točke (brez pasov ali zaponk); Se ne uporablja; Zahteva prenos pasov in/ali zaponk z originalnega sedeža; Drugo
lt-LT: Saugos diržo komplektacija: Diržai pridedami; Sagtys pridedamos (be diržų); Tik tvirtinimo taškai (be diržų ar sagčių); Netaikoma; Reikalingas diržų ir (arba) sagčių perkėlimas nuo originalios sėdynės; Kita
el: Διάταξη για ζώνες ασφαλείας: Περιλαμβάνονται ζώνες; Περιλαμβάνονται πόρπες (όχι ζώνες); Μόνο σημεία στήριξης (χωρίς ζώνες ή πόρπες); Δεν ισχύει; Απαιτείται μεταφορά ζωνών ή/και πορπών από το αρχικό κάθισμα; Άλλο
de: Sicherheitsgurtausstattung: Gurte inbegriffen; Gurtschlösser inbegriffen (keine Gurte); Nur Befestigungspunkte (keine Gurte oder Schlösser); Nicht zutreffend; Erfordert den Umbau von Gurten und/oder Schlössern vom Originalsitzen; Sonstige
zh-TW: 安全帶配備: 包含安全帶; 包含安全帶扣 (無安全帶); 僅有安裝點 (無安全帶或安全帶扣); 不適用; 需從原座椅轉移安全帶和/或安全帶扣; 其他
hr-HR: Osiguravanje sigurnosnog pojasa: Pojasevi uključeni; Kopče uključene (bez pojaseva); Samo točke za montažu (bez pojaseva ili kopči); Nije primjenjivo; Potreban prijenos pojaseva i/ili kopči s originalnog sjedala; Ostalo
hu: Biztonsági öv megléte: Övek mellékelve; Csatok mellékelve (övek nélkül); Csak rögzítési pontok (övek vagy csatok nélkül); Nem alkalmazható; Az eredeti ülés öveinek és/vagy csatjainak áthelyezése szükséges; Egyéb
pt-PT: Equipamento do cinto de segurança: Cintos incluídos; Fivelas incluídas (sem cintos); Apenas pontos de montagem (sem cintos nem fivelas); Não aplicável; Requer transferência dos cintos e/ou fivelas do assento original; Outro
sk-SK: Uchytenie bezpečnostného pásu: Pásy sú súčasťou; Spony sú súčasťou (bez pásov); Iba upevňovacie body (bez pásov alebo spôn); Neaplikovateľné; Vyžaduje sa premiestnenie pásov a/alebo spôn z pôvodného sedadla; Iné
nl: Veiligheidsgordel voorziening: Gordels inbegrepen; Gespen inbegrepen (geen gordels); Alleen montagepunten (geen gordels of gespen); Niet van toepassing; Vereist overdracht van gordels en/of gespen van originele stoel; Overig
nb: Setebelteopplegg: Belter inkludert; Spenner inkludert (uten belter); Kun monteringspunkter (ingen belter eller spenner); Ikke aktuelt; Krever overføring av belter og/eller spenner fra originalsetet; Annet
vi: Chỗ để dây an toàn: Kèm theo dây đai; Kèm theo khóa (không có dây đai); Chỉ có điểm lắp (không có dây hoặc khóa); Không áp dụng; Yêu cầu chuyển dây và/hoặc khóa từ ghế cũ; Khác
bg-BG: Осигуряване на предпазен колан: Включени колани; Включени закопчалки (без колани); Само точки за монтаж (без колани или закопчалки); Неприложимо; Изисква прехвърляне на колани и/или закопчалки от оригиналната седалка; Други
ro-RO: Dotare cu centuri de siguranță: Centuri incluse; Catarame incluse (fără centuri); Doar puncte de montare (fără centuri sau catarame); Nu se aplică; Necesită transferul centurilor și/sau cataramelor de pe scaunul original; Altele
it: Predisposizione delle cinture di sicurezza: Cinture incluse; Fibbie incluse (senza cinture); Solo punti di montaggio (senza cinture o fibbie); Non applicabile; Richiede il trasferimento delle cinture e/o delle fibbie dal sedile originale; Altro
sv: Säkerhetsbälte – utförande: Bälten ingår; Bälteslås ingår (inga bälten); Endast fästpunkter (inga bälten eller lås); Ej tillämpligt; Kräver överflyttning av bälten och/eller lås från originalsäte; Övrigt
en: Seat belt provision: Belts included; Buckles included (no belts); Mounting points only (no belts or buckles); Not applicable; Requires transfer of belts and/or buckles from original seat; Other
zh-CN: 安全带配置情况: 包含安全带; 包含卡扣（不含安全带）; 仅提供安装点（无安全带或卡扣）; 不适用; 需要从原座椅转移安全带和/或卡扣; 其他
pt-BR: Cinto de segurança provisão: Cintos incluídos; Fivelas incluídas (sem cintos); Apenas pontos de fixação (sem cintos ou fivelas); Não se aplica; Requer transferência de cintos e/ou fivelas do assento original; Outros
ko: 안전벨트 포함 여부: 벨트 포함; 버클 포함(벨트 제외); 장착 포인트만(벨트 또는 버클 제외); 해당 없음; 기존 시트의 벨트 및/또는 버클 이식 필요; 기타
fr: Ceintures de sécurité fournies: Ceintures incluses; Boucles incluses (sans ceintures); Points de fixation uniquement (sans ceintures ni boucles); Non applicable; Nécessite le transfert des ceintures et/ou boucles du siège d'origine; Autre
ru: Комплектация ремнем безопасности: Ремни в комплекте; Замки в комплекте (без ремней); Только точки крепления (без ремней и замков); Неприменимо; Требуется перенос ремней и/или замков с оригинального сиденья; Другое
fi: Turvavyöt: Vyöt sisältyvät; Lukot sisältyvät (ei vöitä); Vain kiinnityspisteet (ei vöitä tai lukkoja); Ei sovellu; Vaatii vöiden ja/tai lukkojen siirtämisen alkuperäisestä istuimesta; Muu